District of Columbia statutes.
2-1205.01

Repealed

Establishment of the Office of Local Business Development.

Repealed.

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 221, 46 DCR 6373
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 138, 52 DCR 10637
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 221 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).
Establishment—Task Force on the Impact of the Terrorist Attacks on District Small Business, see Mayor’s Order 2001-150, October 3, 2001 ( 48 DCR 9529).
D.C. Law 13-38, Title II, § 227, provided: “Sec. 227. Applicability. This title shall apply as of October 1, 1999.”